District of Columbia statutes.
2-225.12

Repealed

Authorization to test materials in laboratory of Department of Transportation.

Repealed.

June 29, 1932, 47 Stat. 354, ch. 308
Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 1103(c), 32 DCR 7396
1981 Ed., § 1-1117.
1973 Ed., § 1-814.
The functions of the Department of Transportation were transferred to the Department of Public Works by Reorganization Plan No. 4 of 1983, effective March 1, 1984.